Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.130

License sanction—Grounds—Support order, noncompliance.

(1) In accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may by order sanction the license of any employment agency under RCW 18.235.110, if the director finds that the applicant or licensee has violated any provisions of this chapter, or failed to comply with any rule or regulation issued by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2002 c 86 s 270; 1997 c 58 s 848; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.